Hawaii, session 2026, GM1249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. The legislature finds that continuing shifts in
2 federal policy are creating significant and widespread
3 challenges in Hawaii and across the nation. These federal
4 changes, combined with broader economic trends, are expected to
5 affect Hawaii's fiscal stability in the near future. Reductions
6 in federal funding and uncertainty regarding future federal
7 grant programs require the State to be prepared to assume
8 financial responsibility for critical programs that currently
9 rely on federal support.
10 The legislature further finds that in periods of economic
11 uncertainty, it is essential for the State to maintain the
12 ability to fund important programs with moneys that are not
13 immediately needed elsewhere. In Act 87, Session Laws of
14 Hawaii 2021, the State proactively transferred funds to mitigate
15 fiscal disruptions caused by the coronavirus disease 2019
16 pandemic. A similar approach is warranted in 2026 to ensure the
17 continuity of essential services.
SB2921 GDI LRB 26-1367.docx
■nMiiininiiiiiniiiBiiii

Page 2 S.B. NO. 2921
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
1 Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to transfer
2 non-general fund account balances that exceed one year's
3 operating expenses to the general fund.
4 SECTION 2. The legislature determines that there are
5 amounts in excess of the requirements of the various funds
6 listed in this Act. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
7 the director of finance may transfer the following amounts or so
8 much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 from
9 the following funds to the general fund:
Minimum amount Amount
in excess of authorized to
the be transferred
requirements to the general
FUND NAME of the fund as fund by the
determined by director of
the finance ($)
legislature
($)
Department of Agriculture and Biosecurity
1 ANIMAL INDUSTRY SPECIAL FUND 13,543.00 13,543.00
2 CERTIFICATION SERVICES REVOLVING FUND 50,000.00 50,000.00
3 INDUSTRIAL HEMP SPECIAL FUND 10,000.00 10,000.00
Department of Accounting and General Services
STATE ARCHIVES PRESERVATION AND LONG-TERM
4 ACCESS SPECIAL FUND 100,000.00 100,000.00
Department of the Attorney General
5 MEDICAID INVESTIGATIONS RECOVERY FUND 1,000,000.00 1,000,000.00
6 TOBACCO ENFORCEMENT SPECIAL FUND 500,000.00 500,000.00
7 INTERNET CRIMES AGAINST CHILDREN SPECIAL FUND 100,000.00 100,000.00
8 LITIGATION DEPOSITS TRUST ACCOUNT 74,000.00 74,000.00
Department of Business, Economic Development, and Tourism
9 TOURISM SPECIAL FUND 328,503.00 328,503.00
Department of Human Resources Development
SB2921 CDl LRB 26-1367.docx
■imiHiiHiMiiiinm

Page 3
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
10 HUMAN RESOURCES DEVELOPMENT SPECIAL FUND 250,000.00 250, 000.0.0
Department of Health
11 MENTAL HEALTH AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE SPECIAL FUND 2,500,000.00 2,500,000.00
TITLE XIX MED QUEST CARVEOUT/GENERAL OUTPATIENT
12 SPECIAL FUND 2,500,000.00 2,500,000.00
INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
MEDICAID WAIVER ADMINISTRATIVE CLAIMING SPECIAL
13 FUND 2,000,000.00 2,000,000.00
DISABILITY AND COMMUNICATION ACCESS BOARD
14 SPECIAL FUND 1,000,000.00 1,000,000.00
15 DEPOSIT BEVERAGE CONTAINER DEPOSIT SPECIAL FUND 12,000,000.00 12,000,000.00
Department of Land and Natural Resources
16 SPECIAL LAND AND DEVELOPMENT FUND 1,414,955.00 1,414,955.00
Department of Taxation
17 TAX ADMINISTRATION SPECIAL FUND 23,000,000.00 23,000,000.00
18 CIGARETTE TAX STAMP ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIAL FUND 310,000.00 310,000.00
Total 47,151,001.00 47,151,001.00
1 SECTION 3. It is the intent of this Act not to;
2 (1) Jeopardize the receipt of any federal aid nor to
3 impair the obligation of the State or any of its
4 agencies to the holders of any bond issued by the
5 State or by any of its agencies;
6 (2) Cause the State or any of its agencies to transfer
7 moneys that are encumbered prior to or on the
8 effective date of this Act;
9 (3) Cause the State or any of its agencies to be unable to
10 meet a contractual obligation; and
SB2921 CDl LRB 26-1367.docx 3
■lEHiiiniHiimiiiiigiii

Page 4 S.B. NO. 2921
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
1 (4) Compel the State or any of its agencies to transfer
2 moneys into the general fund that are not eligible to
3 for transfer into the general fund,
4 and to the extent, and only to the extent, necessary to
5 effectuate this intent, the governor may modify the strict
6 provisions of this Act, but shall promptly report any
7 modification with reasons therefor to the legislature at its
8 next session thereafter for review by the legislature.
9 SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026;
10 provided that section 2 shall take effect retroactively on
11 June 30, 2026.
SB2921 CDl LRB 26-1367.docx
IBIlilllllllHIIIIWmiHIIIII

2921
S.B. NO.
I
w
o
b
o
b
APPROVED this 25th day of June ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 2921, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
137-26

SB No. 2921,SD1,HD1,CD1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives